Utah statutes.
78B-8-302.   Process servers.

(1)  Complaints, summonses, and subpoenas may be served by any person 18 years of age or older at the time of service, and who is not a party to the action or a party's attorney.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), the following persons may serve all process issued by the courts of this state:

(a)  a peace officer employed by any political subdivision of the state acting within the scope and jurisdiction of the peace officer's employment;

(b)  a sheriff or appointed deputy sheriff employed by any county of the state;

(c)  a constable, or the constable's deputy, serving in compliance with applicable law; 

(d)  an investigator employed by the state and authorized by law to serve civil process; and

(e)  a private investigator licensed in accordance with Title 53, Chapter 9, Private Investigator Regulation Act.

(3)  Private investigators licensed in accordance with Title 53, Chapter 9, Private Investigator Regulation Act may not arrest anyone pursuant to a bench warrant.  While serving process, a private investigator shall:

(a)  have on the investigator's person a visible form of credentials and identification identifying:

(i)  the person by name;

(ii)  the person as a licensed private investigator; and

(iii)  the name and address of the agency employing the investigator or, if the investigator is self-employed, the address of the investigator's place of business;

(b)  verbally communicate to the person being served that the investigator is acting as a process server; and

(c)  print on the first page of each document served:

(i)  the investigator's name and identification as a private investigator; and

(ii)  the address and phone number for the investigator's place of business.

(4)  Any service under this section where the use of force is authorized on the face of the document, a breach of the peace is imminent, or likely under the totality of the circumstances may only be served by:

(a)  a law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 53-13-103; or

(b)  a constable, as defined in Subsection 53-13-105(1)(b)(ii).

(5)  The following persons may not serve process issued by the courts:

(a)  a person convicted of a felony violation of an offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(16); or

(b)  a person who is a respondent in a proceeding described in Title 78B, Chapter 7, Protective Orders, in which a court has granted the petitioner a protective order.

(6)  A person serving process shall:

(a)  legibly document the date and time of service;

(b)  legibly print the person's name and address on the return of service; and

(c)  sign the return of service in substantial compliance with Section 78B-5-705.



Amended by Chapter 352, 2013 General Session

